Washington statutes.
RCW 41.34.050

Legislature may contribute to members' accounts.

The legislature may authorize contributions to the members' accounts for a biennium through budget appropriation.

[ 1995 c 239 s 205.]

NOTES:

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.